Washington statutes.
RCW 5.48.070

Costs—Payment of.

The costs incurred in the probate and superior courts in proceedings under RCW 5.48.051 and 5.48.060 shall be paid by the party or parties interested in such proceedings, or in whose behalf such proceedings are instituted.

[ 1890 p 340 s 8; RRS s 1277. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1890 p 339 s 6; RRS s 1275, now codified as RCW 5.48.051.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: See note following RCW 5.48.060.